Wisconsin, session 2025, SB10.
do enact as follows:SB10,1Section 1. 118.40 (4) (ar) 3. of the statutes is created to read:118.40 (4) (ar) 3. Allow military recruiters access to high schools operated by the governing board as required under 10 USC 503 (c), except that regardless of the access the governing board provides to postsecondary educational institutions or to prospective employers, the governing board shall allow a military recruiter access to all of the following:a. Common areas of a high school building while the military recruiter visits a high school for recruitment purposes.b. A high school during a school day or a school-sanctioned event. Nothing in this subd. 3. b. requires a school board to allow a military recruiter access to a high school classroom during instructional time.SB10,2Section 2. 119.04 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 66.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, 118.076, 118.10, 118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.258, 118.291, 118.292, 118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), and (15) to (27), and (29), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) (b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools and partnership program.SB10,3Section 3. 120.12 (29) of the statutes is created to read:120.12 (29) Military recruiters. Allow military recruiters access to high schools operated by the school board as required under 10 USC 503 (c), except that regardless of the access the school board provides to postsecondary educational institutions or to prospective employers, the school board shall allow a military recruiter access to all of the following:(a) Common areas of a high school building while the military recruiter visits a high school for recruitment purposes.(b) A high school during a school day or a school-sanctioned event. Nothing in this paragraph requires a school board to allow a military recruiter access to a high school classroom during instructional time.SB10,4Section 4. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to access provided to military recruiters during the 2025-26 school year. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb10 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb10 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB10 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB10 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB10: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting